Hawaii statutes.
§412:5-403 Examination and regulation. Every
intra-Pacific bank shall be subject to examination and regulation by the
commissioner, and shall pay fees and costs to the same extent as any bank
chartered under the laws of this State. [L 1993, c 350, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next